Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.130

Transfer of service credit from statewide city employees' retirement system.

(1) Any person who was a member of the statewide city employees' retirement system governed by chapter 41.44 RCW and who was never reemployed by an employer as defined in RCW 41.40.010 and who is employed by an employer as defined in RCW 41.35.010, may, in a writing filed with the director, elect to:

(a) Transfer to this retirement system all service currently credited under chapter 41.44 RCW;

(b) Reestablish and transfer to this retirement system all service which was previously credited under chapter 41.44 RCW but which was canceled by discontinuance of service and withdrawal of accumulated contributions as provided in RCW 41.44.190. The service may be reestablished and transferred only upon payment by the member to the employees' savings fund of this retirement system of the amount withdrawn plus interest thereon from the date of withdrawal until the date of payment at a rate determined by the director. No additional payments are required for service credit described in this subsection if already established under this chapter; and

(c) Establish service credit for the initial period of employment not to exceed six months, prior to establishing membership under chapter 41.44 RCW, upon payment in full by the member of the total employer's contribution to the benefit account fund of this retirement system that would have been made under this chapter when the initial service was rendered. The payment shall be based on the first month's compensation earnable as a member of the statewide city employees' retirement system and as defined in *RCW 41.44.030(13). However, a person who has established service credit under **RCW 41.40.010(13) (c) or (d) shall not establish additional credit under this subsection nor may anyone who establishes credit under this subsection establish any additional credit under **RCW 41.40.010(13) (c) or (d). No additional payments are required for service credit described in this subsection if already established under this chapter.

(2) The written election must be filed and the payments must be completed in full within one year after employment by an employer.

(3) Upon receipt of the written election and payments required by subsection (1) of this section from any retiree described in subsection (1) of this section, the department shall recompute the retiree's allowance in accordance with this section and shall pay any additional benefit resulting from such recomputation retroactively to the date of retirement from the system governed by this chapter.

(4) Any person who was a member of the statewide city employees' retirement system under chapter 41.44 RCW and also became a member of the public employees' retirement system established under chapter 41.40 RCW or the Washington school employees' retirement system established under this chapter, and did not make the election under RCW 41.40.058 or subsection (1) of this section because he or she was not a member of the public employees' retirement system prior to July 27, 1987, or did not meet the time limitations of RCW 41.40.058 or subsection (2) of this section, may elect to do any of the following:

(a) Transfer to this retirement system all service currently credited under chapter 41.44 RCW;

(b) Reestablish and transfer to this retirement system all service that was previously credited under chapter 41.44 RCW but was canceled by discontinuance of service and withdrawal of accumulated contributions as provided in RCW 41.44.190; and

(c) Establish service credit for the initial period of employment not to exceed six months, prior to establishing membership under chapter 41.44 RCW.

To make the election or elections, the person must pay the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior to retirement from this retirement system.

[ 1998 c 341 s 14.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 41.44.030 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (13) to subsection (10).

**(2) RCW 41.40.010 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (13) to subsection (23).